Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-638
Contracts; sealed bids; advertisement.

Prior to advertisement for sealed bids, plans and specifications for the proposed work or materials shall be prepared and filed at the principal office or place of business of the district. Such advertisement shall be made in three issues, not less than seven days between issues, in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the district and in such additional newspapers or trade or technical periodicals as may be selected by the board in order to give proper notice of the receiving of bids. Such advertisement shall designate the nature of the work proposed to be done or materials proposed to be purchased, that the plans and specifications therefor may be inspected at the office of the district, giving the location thereof, and shall designate the time within which bids shall be filed, and the date, hour and place the same shall be opened.

Laws 1933, c. 86, § 10, p. 351;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-710;

Laws 1943, c. 146, § 4, p. 524;

R.S.1943, § 70-638;

Laws 1981, LB 34, § 3.